District of Columbia statutes.
32-609

Funding.

There is authorized out of the revenues available to the District sums necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The authorized amount shall not exceed $200,000.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-162, § 10, 33 DCR 6684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1109.